Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

23-3.3-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 3.3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education.

(1.5) "Cost of attendance at a nonpublic institution of higher education" means:

Allowances specified by the commission for room and board and miscellaneous expenses, which shall be the same for nonpublic institutions of higher education as for a representative group of comparable state institutions, as determined by the commission; and

An allowance for tuition and fees equal to the lesser of:

The actual tuition and fees charged by the nonpublic institution of higher education; or

One hundred percent of the combination of actual in-state tuition and fees charged by a representative group of comparable state institutions plus the general fund moneys allocated to support such comparable state institutions.

"In-state student" means a student at an institution of higher education who meets the criteria established by article 7 of this title for classification as an in-state student at a state institution of higher education, but "in-state student" does not include a member of the armed forces of the United States or his dependents who are eligible to obtain in-state tuition status upon moving to Colorado on a permanent change-of-station basis until such individual meets the one-year domicile requirement of section 23-7-102 (5).

"Institution" means an educational institution operating in this state that meets all of the following:

Admits as regular students persons having a certification of graduation from a school providing secondary education or comparable qualifications and persons for enrollment in courses which they reasonably may be expected to complete successfully;

Is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association and, in the case of private occupational schools, holds a regular certificate in accordance with the provisions of article 64 of this title 23;

Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's degree;

Provides not less than a two-year program which is acceptable for full credit towards such a degree; or

Provides not less than a six-month program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation;

Is not a branch program of an institution of higher education whose principal campus and facilities are located outside this state.

(3.5) "Nonpublic institution of higher education" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 23-3.7-102 (3).

(3.7) "Professional degree in theology" means a certificate signifying a person's graduation from a degree program that is:

Devotional in nature or designed to induce religious faith; and

Offered by an institution as preparation for a career in the clergy.

"State institution" means an institution supported in whole or in part by general fund moneys.

"Undergraduate" refers to any program leading toward a bachelor's degree or associate degree or any nondegree program providing training for employment in a recognized occupation.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 824, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 81:

(3)(b) amended, p. 852, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2) and (3)(d) amended, p. 788, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

(2) amended, p. 60, § 3, effective August 15.

L. 90:

(1.5) and (3.5) added, p. 1145, § 2, effective May 17.

L. 2009:

(3)(d) amended and (3.7) added, (HB 09-1267), ch. 348, p. 1823, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 2017:

IP, IP(3), and (3)(b) amended, (HB 17-1239), ch. 261, p. 1205, § 12, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1990 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 1990. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act amending subsection (3)(d) and adding subsection (3.7), see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

23-3.3-102. Assistance program authorized - procedure - audits.

The general assembly hereby authorizes the commission to establish a program of financial assistance, to be operated during any school sessions, including summer sessions for students attending institutions.

The commission shall determine, by guideline, the institutions eligible for participation in the program and shall annually determine the amount allocated to each institution.

Each state institution shall administer a financial assistance program according to policies and procedures established by the governing board of the institution. Each private institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-18-102 (9), that participates in the program of financial assistance established pursuant to this section shall administer a financial assistance program according to policies and procedures established by the governing board of the institution. Each participating nonpublic institution that is not a private institution of higher education shall administer a financial assistance program according to policies and procedures established by the commission. Each institution shall fund its assistance program using state moneys allocated to the institution and institutional moneys.

(3.5) Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, each participating institution shall adopt policies and procedures to allow a person who meets the following criteria to qualify for financial assistance through the financial assistance programs established pursuant to this article:

The person qualifies as an in-state student; and

The person is enrolled at an institution that participates in the programs of financial assistance established pursuant to this article; and

The person is enrolled in an approved program of preparation, as defined in section 22-60.5-102 (8), C.R.S., for principals.

Program disbursements shall be handled by the institution subject to audit and review.

Upon commencement of participation in the program, no participating institution shall decrease the amount of its own funds spent for student aid below the amount so spent prior to participation in the program.

In determining the amount allocated to each institution that is not a state institution or a nonpublic institution of higher education, the commission shall consider only that portion of financial need which would have existed were the institution's tuition no greater than the highest in-state tuition rate charged by a comparable state institution. In determining the amount allocated to each nonpublic institution of higher education, the commission shall base its determination upon the cost of attendance at a nonpublic institution of higher education.

Each annual budget request submitted by the commission shall provide information on the proposed distribution of moneys among the programs developed under this article. Subsequent to final appropriation, the commission shall provide to the joint budget committee an allocation proposal specifically identifying the distributions among programs for the coming year. Expenditures in any program shall not exceed the allocation for that program by more than ten percent of such allocation, and the total appropriation for all student aid programs shall not be exceeded. The commission may require such reports from institutions as are necessary to fulfill the reporting requirements of this subsection (7) and to perform other administrative tasks.

The state auditor or his or her designee shall audit, in accordance with state statute and federal guidelines, the program at any participating institution every other year to review residency determinations, needs analyses, awards, payment procedures, and such other practices as may be necessary to ensure that the program is being properly administered, but the audit shall be limited to the administration of the program at the participating institution. The state auditor may accept an audit of the program from an institution that is not a state institution from such institution's independent auditor. The cost of conducting audits of the program at an institution that is not a state institution shall be borne by such institution.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 825, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 81:

(4) amended, p. 341, § 6, effective March 27.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 788, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(4), (6), and (8) amended and (9) added, p. 1146, § 3, effective May 17.

L. 96:

(9) repealed, p. 1238, § 84, effective August 7.

L. 99:

(7) amended, p. 850, § 4, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

(6) amended, p. 913, § 17, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(3.5) added, p. 1245, § 9, effective May 26; (8) amended, p. 1495, § 29, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(2), (3), IP(3.5), (4), and (8) amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1845, § 19, effective June 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1990 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 1990. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996. For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act amending subsections (2), (3), IP(3.5), (4), and (8), see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

23-3.3-103. Annual appropriations - repeal.

The annual appropriations for student financial assistance under this article shall increase by at least the same percentage as the aggregate percentage increase of all general fund appropriations to institutions of higher education. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or impair the authority of the Colorado commission on higher education under section 23-1-105.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section concerning appropriations for student financial assistance under this article shall not apply to said appropriations for the 2010-11 fiscal year.

Repealed.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section concerning appropriations for student financial assistance under this article 3.3 shall not apply to appropriations made to the forest restoration and wildfire risk mitigation grant program cash fund created in section 23-31-301 (8.5)(a).

Repealed.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section concerning appropriations for student financial assistance under this article do not apply to appropriations made pursuant to sections 23-18-308 (1)(f) and 23-60-202.7 to the state board for community colleges and occupational education to provide services to maximize concurrent enrollment across the community college system.

Repealed.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section concerning appropriations for student financial assistance under this article 3.3 do not apply to appropriations for the 2021-22 fiscal year for increases in funding for the institutions of higher education that restore aggregate general fund appropriations to a level at or below the level of such appropriations for the 2019-20 fiscal year.

For the 2021-22 fiscal year, subsection (1) of this section is calculated based on 2020-21 fiscal year financial aid appropriations enacted during the 2020 regular legislative session and does not include any supplemental appropriation for financial aid enacted during the 2021 legislative session.

This subsection (9) is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section concerning appropriations for student financial assistance under this article 3.3 do not apply to appropriations made for the purpose of conducting feasibility studies and pilot deployments to investigate emerging technologies for water management pursuant to section 23-20-141.

This subsection (10) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section concerning appropriations for student financial assistance under this article 3.3 do not apply to appropriations made pursuant to sections 23-18-308 (1)(i) and 23-20-142 for the educator well-being and mental health program.

This subsection (11) is repealed, effective July 1, 2026.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 976, § 2, effective July 1, 1990.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1383), ch. 361, p. 1714, § 2, effective June 7.

L. 2016:

(3) added, (SB 16-196), ch. 226, p. 865, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2019:

(4) added, (HB 19-1294), ch. 318, p. 2962, § 2, effective May 28; (5) added, (HB 19-1006), ch. 398, p. 3538, § 2, effective May 31; (6) added, (HB 19-1202), ch. 403, p. 3573, § 3, effective May 31; (8) added, (HB 19-1264), ch. 420, p. 3680, § 9, effective June 30; (7) added, (SB 19-176), ch. 244, p. 2390, § 11, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(9) added, (SB 21-083), ch. 13, p. 85, § 1, effective March 21; (10) added, (HB 21-1268), ch. 258, p. 1518, § 4, effective June 18; (11) added, (SB 21-185), ch. 246, p. 1340, § 26, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(3) repealed, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2974, § 47, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Subsections (4)(b), (6)(b), and (8) provided for the repeal of subsections (4), (6), and (8), respectively, effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2019, pp. 2962, 3573, 3680.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1268, see section 1 of chapter 258, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-3.3-104. Assistance to professional theology students prohibited.

The policies and procedures established by the commission pursuant to section 23-3.3-102 (3) shall include:

A prohibition against the awarding of any financial assistance pursuant to this article to a student who is pursuing a professional degree in theology; except that the prohibition described in this section shall not apply to financial assistance that is awarded to a student from a federal program, including but not limited to Title IV of the federal "Higher Education Act of 1965", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1070, as amended; and

A requirement that an institution or nonpublic institution of higher education that seeks to award financial assistance to a student pursuant to this article certify that the student is not pursuing a professional degree in theology.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1267), ch. 348, p. 1823, § 3, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2009 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

23-3.3-105. Free application for federal student assistance - working group - report - legislative declaration - definition - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1330), ch. 377, p. 2511, § 14, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 2022. (See L. 2021, p. 2511.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1330, see section 1 of chapter 377, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-3.3-106. Technology to support FAFSA and CASFA - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"CASFA" means the Colorado application for state financial aid.

"Department" means the department of higher education.

"FAFSA" means the free application for federal student aid.

"Local education provider" means a school district, a charter school authorized by a school district pursuant to part 1 of article 30.5 of title 22, a charter school authorized by the state charter school institute pursuant to part 5 of article 30.5 of title 22, or a board of cooperative services created and operating pursuant to article 5 of title 22 that operates one or more public schools.

The department shall use technology to assist in increasing the number of students who complete the FAFSA and CASFA forms. On or before September 15, 2023, the department shall develop a tool kit and training outlining web tools and resources for use by higher education administrators, middle and high schools, and nonprofit organizations that support the completion of FAFSA and CASFA forms. The tool kit must include free resources, including:

Net price calculators and information about how to use calculators to outline resources available based on financial need;

Supports for populations of students who have accommodations as outlined by the FAFSA or youth who may be considered independent according to federal department of education policies, including:

Youth who have deceased parents, are currently or previously were in foster care, or are a ward of the court;

Emancipated minors;

Youth under a legal guardianship; and

Youth who are homeless, self-supporting, or at risk of homelessness;

Information for students who are the first in their family to attend college and how to navigate financial aid resources and application processes; and

Public information available through state or federal entities.

The information in the tool kit must be:

Offered in multiple languages; and

Updated annually for educators and nonprofit organizations to support students and families in developing individual career and education plans pursuant to sections 22-32-109 (1)(oo) and 22-30.5-525 and career-connected strategies, such as work-based learning in support of financial literacy education and completion of the financial aid forms.

The department should consider avoiding duplication of efforts by leveraging existing resources in creating the tool kit.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before October 15, 2023, and on or before October 15 each year thereafter, the department shall submit to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, a report concerning:

The steps that the department has made to improve the tool kit;

Any recommendations for legislative changes necessary to improve FAFSA and CASFA completion rates;

Subject to data availability and data privacy requirements, data indicating the FAFSA and CASFA completion rates by high school and school district and, where available, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, first-generation status, and Pell grant eligibility for:

Adults by county; and

High schools and school districts; and

Other information as determined by the department or partner agencies, including, but not limited to, the Colorado department of education, Colorado workforce development council, Colorado department of labor and employment, or office of economic development and international trade in support of Colorado's economic and job needs.

The department shall make improvements to its web-based financial aid completion tool to support schools and school districts across Colorado in determining which students have competed financial aid forms by:

Updating and modernizing the completion tool with federal and state financial aid information; and

Displaying the information for FAFSA and CASFA completion and verification status on a local level to show how many students in a high school have completed an application form and make the information accessible by school or district administrators in alignment with state data privacy regulations and requirements.

Financial information shall not be shared in this tool. The tool may only be used to show application completion, partial completion, and verification status.

The department shall support college access activities by:

Providing career advising aligned with Colorado's critical industry shortage areas;

Providing information about degree programs in alignment with in-demand, high-wage jobs;

Providing information about the application and financial aid processes associated with accessing postsecondary education;

Supporting students and families in completing financial aid applications; and

Providing information associated with return-on-investment and financial literacy education in relation to additional education beyond high school, including:

Degree programs;

Credentials;

Apprenticeships;

Work-based learning; and

Scholarships, grants, and other financial tools to support postsecondary education.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate six hundred eighty thousand dollars from the general fund to the department for the purposes of this section. Any unexpended money remaining at the end of the 2022-23 state fiscal year:

Does not revert to the general fund or any other fund;

May be used by the department in subsequent state fiscal years without further appropriation; and

Shall not be used for any other purpose other than the purposes set forth in this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1366), ch. 244, p. 1817, § 8, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1366, see section 1 of chapter 244, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-3.3-107. Improvements to CASFA - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"CASFA" means the Colorado application for state financial aid.

"Department" means the department of higher education.

"FAFSA" means the free application for federal student aid.

On or before July 1, 2024, the department shall make the following improvements to the CASFA:

Improve the accessibility and ease of use in completing the CASFA forms;

Improve the form and application by conducting focus groups and consulting organizations serving CASFA-eligible students and families, including streamlining to mirror modernizations in the FAFSA application;

Assessing the existing functionality of the CASFA process, web tool, and application;

Identifying and improving website functionality; and

Providing the department of education with support for students and families on an ongoing capacity.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate three hundred twenty thousand dollars from the general fund to the department for the purposes of this section. Any unexpended money remaining at the end of the 2022-23 state fiscal year:

Does not revert to the general fund or any other fund;

May be used by the department in subsequent state fiscal years without further appropriation; and

Shall not be used for any other purpose other than the purposes set forth in this section.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1366), ch. 244, p. 1820, § 8, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1366, see section 1 of chapter 244, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.